District of Columbia statutes.
31-121

Regulations.

The Commissioner may promulgate rules, regulations, and orders as are necessary or appropriate to conform to the Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act, approved November 12, 1999 (113 Stat. 1338; codified in scattered sections of the U.S. Code), or regulations promulgated thereunder.

Oct. 21, 2000, D.C. Law 13-191, § 8, 47 DCR 7311

History

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of the Insurer Confidentiality and Information Sharing Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-444, October 24, 2000, 47 DCR 9007).

Emergency Legislation